n11.dix
<pardef n="go/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>vu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vugalYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vugalYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vina</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vinalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l></l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYe</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="patAlaM/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l></l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>annu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>niMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>na deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>lYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>niMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>na</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>lYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l></l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYe</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="go"><i>go</i><par n="go/_n"/></e>
<e lm="patAlaM"><i>patAlaM</i><par n="patAlaM/_n"/></e>
